Utah statutes.
23-15-7.   Taking protected aquatic wildlife or eggs unlawful except as
authorized.
It is unlawful for any person to take any protected aquatic wildlife or eggs
of same in any of the waters of this state, except as provided by this code or
the rules and regulations of the Wildlife Board.
